Alaska statutes. Title 14. Education, Libraries, and Museums.
Article 2. Teachers’ Defined Benefit Retirement Plan.
Sec. 14.25.173.
Adjustments.

When a change or error is made in the records maintained by the plan or in the contributions made on behalf of an employee or an error is made in computing a benefit, and, as a result, a teacher or member or beneficiary is entitled to receive from the plan more or less than the teacher or member or beneficiary would have been entitled to receive had the records or contributions been correct or had the error not been made, (1) the records, contributions, or error shall be corrected, and (2) as far as practicable, future payments or benefit entitlement shall be adjusted so that the actuarial equivalent of the pension or benefit to which the teacher or member or beneficiary was correctly entitled will be paid. An adjustment to contributions shall be picked up by the employer in accordance with AS

14.25.050

or treated as an adjustment to the employer’s contributions in accordance with this section, depending upon the nature of the adjustment. If no future benefit payments are due, a person who was paid any amount to which the person was not entitled is liable for repayment of that amount, and a person who was not paid the full amount to which the person was entitled shall be paid that amount.

An adjustment that requires the recovery of benefits may not be made under this section if

the incorrect benefit was first paid two years or more before the member or beneficiary was notified of the error;

the error was not the result of erroneous information supplied by the member or beneficiary; and

the member or beneficiary did not have reasonable grounds to believe that the amount of the benefit was in error.

At least quarterly, the administrator shall report to the commissioner of administration on all situations since the administrator’s last report in which an adjustment has been prohibited under (b) of this section. If the commissioner of administration finds that there is reason to believe that one or more of the conditions set out in (b) of this section have not been met, the administrator shall notify the member or beneficiary that an adjustment will be made to recover the overpayment. A member or beneficiary who receives notice of adjustment under this subsection may file a request with the commissioner of administration for a waiver of the adjustment under AS

14.25.175

. An adjustment that requires the repayment of benefits may not be required while the waiver request is pending.

The plan shall pay interest on amounts owed to a member or beneficiary. Interest shall be charged on amounts owed to the plan by a member or beneficiary if the amount owed is the result of erroneous information supplied by the member or beneficiary, or the member or beneficiary had reasonable grounds to believe the amount of the benefit was in error. The interest paid under this subsection is at the rate established by regulation for indebtedness contributions owed. Interest accrues from the date on which the correct payment was due and continues until an actuarial adjustment to the benefit is effective or the amount owed is paid. Accrued interest for periods less than 60 days or in amounts less than the limit established in regulation for writing off small indebtedness and refund balances may not be collected or paid under this subsection.

History.

(§ 4 ch 169 SLA 1976; am § 1 ch 15 SLA 1984; am § 2 ch 82 SLA 1986; am § 11 ch 59 SLA 2002; am § 23 ch 9 FSSLA 2005)

Revisor’s notes. —

Under sec. 144, ch. 9, FSSLA 2005, “plan” was substituted for “system” in this section.

Administrative Code. —

For benefits under the defined benefits plan of the teachers’ retirement system, see 2 AAC 36, art. 3.

Sec. 14.25.175.
Waiver of adjustments.

Upon request by an affected member or beneficiary under (b) of this section, the commissioner of administration may waive an adjustment or a portion of an adjustment made under AS

14.25.173

if, in the opinion of the commissioner of administration,

the adjustment or portion of the adjustment will cause undue hardship to the member or beneficiary;

the adjustment was not the result of erroneous information supplied by the member or beneficiary;

before the adjustment was made, the member or beneficiary received confirmation from the administrator that the member’s or beneficiary’s records were correct; and

the member or beneficiary had no reasonable grounds to believe the records were incorrect before the adjustment was made.

In order to obtain consideration of a waiver under this section, the affected member or beneficiary shall file a request with the commissioner of administration in writing within 30 days after receipt of notice that the records have been adjusted. The ruling of the commissioner of administration shall be in writing.

A ruling of the commissioner of administration to deny a waiver under (b) of this section may be appealed to the office of administrative hearings.

The office of administrative hearings may reverse the commissioner of administration’s decision to deny a waiver and may impose conditions on granting a waiver that it considers equitable. These conditions may include requiring the member or beneficiary to make additional contributions to the plan.

[Repealed, § 132 ch 9 FSSLA 2005.]

[Repealed, § 57 ch 68 SLA 2000.]

[Repealed, § 57 ch 68 SLA 2000.]

History.

(§ 1 ch 81 SLA 1979; am § 24 ch 137 SLA 1982; am §§ 11, 12, 57 ch 68 SLA 2000; am §§ 24 — 27, 132 ch 9 FSSLA 2005)

Administrative Code. —

For administration of the defined benefits plan ( AS

14.25.009

—

14.25.220

), see 2 AAC 36, art. 2.

For benefits under the defined benefits plan of the teachers’ retirement system, see 2 AAC 36, art. 3.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2005 amendment, effective July 28, 2005, substituted “commissioner of education” for “board” in two places in the introductory language of subsection (a) and two places in subsection (b); substituted “request” for “appeal” at the beginning of subsection (a); substituted “shall file a request with” for “must appeal to” in subsection (b); rewrote subsection (c); in subsection (d) rewrote the first sentence and substituted “plan” for “system” in the second sentence; and repealed subsection (e).

Sec. 14.25.177.
Effect of amendments; determination of benefits upon termination.

An amendment to AS

14.25.009

—

14.25.220

is not retroactive unless its retroactivity is expressly stated in the amendment.

The monthly amount of a benefit payable under AS

14.25.009

—

14.25.220

shall be determined in accordance with the provisions of AS

14.25.009

—

14.25.220

in effect on the date of termination of the member’s last segment of employment.

History.

(§ 4 ch 169 SLA 1976; am § 21 ch 13 SLA 1980)

Revisor’s notes. —

Under sec. 144, ch. 9, FSSLA 2005, “AS

14.25.009

—

14.25.220

” was substituted for “this chapter” in this section.

Cross references. —

For general rule on retroactivity of legislation, which (a) of this section restates, see AS

01.10.090

.

Editor’s notes. —

In general, a person’s right to benefits under the state’s public employee retirement systems vests when the person joins the system. Hammond v. Hoffbeck, 627 P.2d 1052 (Alaska 1981). Therefore, former law may govern the benefits of some members of the teachers’ retirement system. The user is advised to ascertain which version of a particular statute is applicable. Earlier versions of the statutes can be found in prior editions of the Alaska Statutes or in the published Session Laws of Alaska.

Sec. 14.25.180.
Management and investment of fund. [Repealed, § 132 ch 9 FSSLA 2005.]

Sec. 14.25.181.
Exclusive benefit; use of forfeitures; limitations.

The corpus or income of the assets held in trust as required by the plan may not be diverted to or used for other than the exclusive benefit of the members or their beneficiaries.

If, upon termination of the plan, all liabilities are satisfied, any excess assets shall be deposited in the general fund, subject to the approval of the termination by the Internal Revenue Service.

The administrator shall use forfeitures that arise for any reason, including from termination of employment or death, to reduce employer contributions. Forfeitures may not be applied to increase the benefits of any member.

The administrator shall determine the amount of any benefit that is determined on the basis of actuarial tables using assumptions approved by the commissioner of administration. The amount of benefits is not subject to employer discretion.

Employee contributions paid to, and retirement benefits paid from, the plan may not exceed the annual limits on contributions and benefits, respectively, allowed by 26 U.S.C. 415. Notwithstanding any contrary provision of law, the administrator may modify a request by a member to make a contribution to the plan if the amount of the contribution would exceed the limits provided in 26 U.S.C. 415 by using the following methods:

if the law requires a lump sum payment for the purchase of service credit, the administrator may establish a periodic payment plan for the member to avoid a contribution in excess of the limits under 26 U.S.C. 415(c) or (n);

if a periodic payment plan under (1) of this subsection will not avoid a contribution in excess of the limits imposed by 26 U.S.C. 415(c), the administrator may either reduce the member’s contribution to an amount within the limits of that section or refuse the member’s contribution.

History.

(§ 12 ch 59 SLA 2002; am §§ 12, 13 ch 20 SLA 2007; am § 1 ch 52 SLA 2014)

Revisor’s notes. —

Under sec. 144, ch. 9, FSSLA 2005, “plan” was substituted for “system” in this section.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2014 amendment, effective June 24, 2014, in (b), substituted “be deposited in the general fund,” for “revert to the employers as determined by the administrator”.

Sec. 14.25.190.
Management and investment of fund. [Repealed, § 132 ch 9 FSSLA 2005.]

Sec. 14.25.195.
Special rules for treatment of qualified military service.

Notwithstanding any contrary provisions of AS

14.25.009

—

14.25.220

, with respect to qualified military service, contributions shall be made and benefits and service credit shall be provided in accordance with 26 U.S.C. 414(u).

To the extent required by 26 U.S.C. 401(a)(37), if a member dies while performing qualified military service, as defined in 38 U.S.C. 43, the survivors of the member are entitled to any additional benefits that would have been provided to the survivors under the plan had the member resumed employment and then terminated employment on account of death. For purposes of this subsection, periods of qualified military service are not included in calculations of credited service.

Consistent with and to the extent required by 26 U.S.C. 414(u)(12), a member receiving differential wage payments from an employer shall be treated as employed by that employer, and the differential wage payment shall be treated as compensation for purposes of applying the limits on annual additions under 26 U.S.C. 415(b). For purposes of this subsection, “differential wage payment” means any payment that

is made by an employer to an individual with respect to any period during which the individual is performing service in the uniformed services, as defined in 38 U.S.C. 43, while on active duty for a period of more than 30 days; and

represents all or a portion of the wages the individual would have received from the employer if the individual were performing service for the employer.

History.

(§ 13 ch 59 SLA 2002; am § 1 ch 102 SLA 2014)

Revisor's notes. —

Under sec. 144, ch. 9, FSSLA 2005, “AS

14.25.009

—

14.25.220

” was substituted for “this chapter” in this section.

Cross references. —

For governor’s transmittal letter for ch. 102, SLA 2014, adding subsections (b) and (c) to this section, see 2014 Senate Journal 1469 — 1470.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2014 amendment, effective July 29, 2014, added (b), retroactive to January 1, 2007, and (c), retroactive to January 1, 2009.

Editor's notes. —

Under sec. 11, ch. 102, SLA 2014, subsection (b) is retroactive to January 1, 2007, and subsection (c) is retroactive to January 1, 2009.

Subsections (b) and (c) of this section, as introduced by the governor and passed by the legislature, refer to 38 U.S.C. 43 but this statute does not exist. It is possible that this reference was intended to refer to 38 U.S.C. 4301 - 4335.

Sec. 14.25.200.
Exemption from taxation and process.

Except as provided in AS

29.45.030(a)(1)

or in (c) of this section, member contributions and other amounts held in the plan on behalf of a member or other person who is or may become eligible for benefits under the plan are exempt from Alaska state and municipal taxes and are not subject to anticipation, alienation, sale, transfer, assignment, pledge, encumbrance, or charge of any kind, either voluntary or involuntary, before they are received by the person entitled to the amount under the terms of the plan. Any attempt to anticipate, alienate, sell, transfer, assign, pledge, encumber, charge, or otherwise dispose of any right to amounts accrued in the plan is void. However, a member’s right to receive benefits or the member contribution account may be assigned

under a qualified domestic relations order;

to a trust or similar legal device that meets the requirements for a Medicaid-qualifying trust under AS

47.07.020(f)

and 42 U.S.C. 1396p(d)(4); or

as provided in (c) of this section.

Member contributions and other amounts held in the plan and benefits payable under AS

14.25.009

—

14.25.220

are exempt from garnishment, execution, or levy as provided in AS 09.38 (exemptions).

An inactive member may elect to have the taxable portion of the member contribution account transferred directly to another plan or an individual retirement arrangement that is qualified under the federal Internal Revenue Code and that accepts the transfer.

History.

(§ 22 ch 145 SLA 1955; am § 17 ch 89 SLA 1960; am § 13 ch 84 SLA 1969; am § 22 ch 13 SLA 1980; am § 3 ch 62 SLA 1982; am § 3 ch 82 SLA 1986; am § 18 ch 117 SLA 1986; am § 17 ch 106 SLA 1988; am § 5 ch 31 SLA 1992; am § 2 ch 102 SLA 1994; am §§ 13, 14 ch 68 SLA 2000)

Revisor’s notes. —

Under sec. 144, ch. 9, FSSLA 2005, “AS

14.25.009

—

14.25.220

” was substituted for “this chapter” and “plan” was substituted for “system” in this section.

Administrative Code. —

For benefits under the defined benefits plan of the teachers’ retirement system, see 2 AAC 36, art. 3.

Sec. 14.25.205.
Time limit for application.

If an application for benefits or for refund has not been filed with the administrator by July 1 following the date on which an inactive member (except a member on leave of absence without pay) would attain age 75, or if an application for benefits or for refund has not been filed with the administrator within the 50 years following the most recent date on which the person was an active member, benefits or refunds may not be paid under AS

14.25.009

—

14.25.220

and the member’s records may be destroyed.

History.

(§ 14 ch 84 SLA 1969; am § 23 ch 13 SLA 1980)

Revisor’s notes. —

Under sec. 144, ch. 9, FSSLA 2005, “AS

14.25.009

—

14.25.220

” was substituted for “this chapter” in this section.

Sec. 14.25.210.
Penalty for false statements.

A person who knowingly makes a false statement, or falsifies or permits to be falsified any record of this plan, in an attempt to defraud this plan, is guilty of a class A misdemeanor.

In this section, “knowingly” has the meaning given in AS

11.81.900(a)

.

History.

(§ 20 ch 145 SLA 1955; am §§ 15, 16 ch 68 SLA 2000; am § 28 ch 9 FSSLA 2005)

Cross references. —

For penalties for class A misdemeanors, see 12.55.035 for fines and 12.55.135 for imprisonment.

Sec. 14.25.212.
Pension forfeiture.

The provisions of AS

37.10.310

apply to pension benefits under AS

14.25.009

—

14.25.220

.

History.

(§ 4 ch 47 SLA 2007)

Sec. 14.25.220.
Definitions.

In AS

14.25.009

—

14.25.220

, unless the context requires otherwise,

“active member” means a member who is employed by an employer, is receiving compensation on a full-time or part-time basis and is making contributions to the plan, or a member making contributions under AS

14.20.330

or

14.20.345

;

“actuarial adjustment” means the adjustment necessary to obtain equality in value of the aggregate expected payments under two different forms of pension payments, considering expected mortality and interest earnings on the basis of assumptions, factors, and methods specified in regulations issued under the plan that are formally adopted by the board and that clearly preclude employer discretion in the determination of the amount of any member’s benefit;

“administrator” means the commissioner of administration or the commissioner’s designee under AS

14.25.003

;

“annuitant” means a retired member or a disabled member who is receiving a benefit under this plan;

“average base salary” means the result obtained by dividing the sum of the member’s three highest years’ base salary by three, or if a member does not have three years base salary, then by dividing the sum of all base salaries by the number of years of base salary; the base salary for a year in which credit is granted for disability totaling more than one-third of a year may not be used in the computation of the average base salary; the base salary in a school year for which the member receives compensation for less than two-thirds of a year may not be used in the computation of the average base salary; if compensation is received for more than two-thirds of a year, the full base salary for that school year shall be used in the computation of the average base salary;

“base salary”

means the total remuneration payable under contract for a full year of membership service, including addenda to the contract but, for a member first hired on or after July 1, 1996, does not include remuneration in excess of the limitations set out in 26 U.S.C. 401(a)(17);

has the same meaning as “compensation” under AS

39.35.680

(9) when applied to a state legislator who elects membership under AS

14.25.040(b)

;

“beneficiary” means a person designated by a member to receive benefits that may be due from the plan upon the member’s death;

“BIA service” means service, including partial years, as a teacher, a certificated person employed in a full-time position requiring a teaching certificate as a condition of employment, or a Bureau of Indian Affairs professional educator in a school or school system contracted or operated by the Bureau of Indian Affairs in Alaska;

“board” means the Alaska Retirement Management Board established under AS

37.10.210

;

“compensation” means the total remuneration paid under contract to a member for services rendered during a school year, including cost-of-living differentials, payments for leave that is actually used by the member, the amount by which the member’s wages are reduced under AS

39.30.150(c)

, an amount that is contributed by the employer under a salary reduction agreement and that is not includable in the gross income of the employee under 26 U.S.C. 125 or 132(f)(4), and the amount deferred under an employer-sponsored deferred compensation plan or the tax shelter annuity plan approved by the Department of Education and Early Development, but does not include retirement benefits, welfare benefits, per diem, expense allowances, workers’ compensation payments, or payments for leave not used by the member, whether those leave payments are scheduled payments, lump-sum payments, donations, or cash-ins; for purposes of AS

14.25.050

, compensation paid includes any payment made after June 30 of a school year for services rendered before the end of the school year;

“credited service” means

all membership service as defined in this section, territorial employment as defined in this section, plus outside, military, and Alaska BIA service, with outside and military service limited to 10 years except under the conditions set out in AS

14.25.100

;

for purposes of eligibility for benefits under AS

14.25.009

—

14.25.220

, service for which no indebtedness is owed;

“deferred vested member” means an inactive member who meets the service requirements of a vested member;

“dependent child” means an unmarried child of a member, including an adopted child, who is dependent upon the member for support and who is either (A) less than 19 years old, or (B) less than 23 years old and registered at and attending on a full-time basis an accredited educational or technical institution recognized by the Department of Education and Early Development; the age limits set out in this paragraph do not apply to a child who is totally and permanently disabled;

“disabled member” means a member who is terminated, who has not received a refund from the plan, and who is receiving a disability benefit from the plan;

“early retirement” means retirement under AS

14.25.110(b)

;

“employer” means a public school district, the Board of Regents of the University of Alaska, the Department of Education and Early Development, the Regional Resource Centers, or the state legislature with respect to a state legislator who elects membership under AS

14.25.040(b)

;

“fiscal year” means the period beginning on July 1 and ending on June 30 of the following calendar year;

“former member” means a member who is terminated and who received a total refund of the balance of the mandatory contribution account, or who has requested in writing a refund of the balance of the mandatory contribution account;

“full-time teacher” means a teacher occupying a position requiring teaching on a regular basis for the normal work period per day or week at a teaching assignment, excluding teaching as an assistant or graduate assistant or teaching on a substitute, temporary, or per diem basis;

“inactive teacher or member” means a member who is terminated and who has not received a refund from the plan or a member who is on leave of absence and who is not making contributions under AS

14.20.345

;

“Internal Revenue Code” means the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended;

“member contribution account” means the total maintained by the plan of the member’s mandatory contributions, indebtedness principal and interest payments, interest credited to each of those accounts, and adjustments to the account in accordance with AS

14.25.173

;

“membership service” means

full or part-time service as a teacher in a public school in the Territory or State of Alaska, or both, under the supervision and control of the Territorial Board of Education or the Department of Education and Early Development or the school board of a city, regional educational attendance area, or borough school district;

full-time or part-time teaching at the University of Alaska or a full-time administrative position at the University of Alaska that requires academic standing and that has been approved for inclusion in the plan by the administrator;

any period during which the teacher receives a disability benefit under this plan or is on an approved sabbatical leave granted in accordance with AS

14.20.310

;

continuous service as a state legislator when performed by a state legislator who elects membership under AS

14.25.040(b)

, subject to the requirements of AS

14.25.040(c)

;

full-time or part-time service as an employee of the Special Education Service Agency, subject to the requirements of AS

14.25.047

; or

full-time or part-time service as an Alaska Native language or culture expert, subject to the requirements of AS

14.25.048

;

“military service” means active duty in the armed forces of the United States;

“nonpublic school” means a school established by an agency other than a state that is primarily supported by other than public funds, and operation of whose program rests with other than publicly elected or appointed officials, and is state approved or accredited;

“non-vested member” means an active or inactive member who does not meet the requirements of a vested member or deferred vested member;

“normal retirement” means retirement under AS

14.25.110(a)

;

“outside service” means service for full years as defined by 47(A)(x) and 47(B)(xi) of this section

as a certificated full-time elementary or secondary teacher or a certificated person in a full-time position requiring a teaching certificate as a condition of employment in an out-of-state public school within the United States, or in a school outside the United States supported by funds of the United States;

as a certificated full-time elementary or secondary teacher or a certificated person in a full-time position requiring a teaching certificate as a condition of employment in an approved or accredited nonpublic school within the United States, or in a school outside the United States supported by funds of the United States;

in a full-time position requiring academic standing in an out-of-state institution of higher learning accredited by a nationally recognized accrediting agency as listed in the Education Directory — Colleges and Universities by the National Center for Education Statistics;

as a full-time teacher in an approved or accredited nonpublic institution of higher learning in Alaska;

“part-time teacher” means a teacher occupying a position requiring teaching on a regular basis for at least 50 percent of the normal workweek at a teaching assignment, excluding teaching as an assistant or graduate assistant, or teaching on a substitute, temporary, or per diem basis;

“past service liability” means the actuarially determined excess of the accrued liability of the plan over the value of the plan’s assets, as of the date of the last actuarial valuation;

“permanent disability” means a physical or mental condition that, in the judgment of the administrator, based upon medical reports and other evidence satisfactory to the administrator, presumably prevents a member from satisfactorily performing the member’s usual duties for the member’s employer or the duties of another position or job that an employer makes available for which the member is qualified by training or education;

“plan” means the retirement benefit plan established under AS

14.25.009

—

14.25.220

;

“prescribed rate of interest” means the rate of interest used for computing employer contributions, for preparing actuarial tables used by the plan, for crediting interest to members’ contributions, and for charging interest on members’ indebtedness accounts;

“public school” means a school operated by publicly elected or appointed school officials in which the program and activities are under the control of those officials and that is supported by public funds;

“qualified domestic relations order” means a divorce or dissolution judgment under AS 25.24, including an order approving a property settlement, that

creates or recognizes the existence of an alternate payee’s right to, or assigns to an alternate payee the right to, receive all or a portion of the member contribution account or benefits payable with respect to a member;

sets out the name and last known mailing address, if any, of the member and of each alternate payee covered by the order;

sets out the amount or percentage of the member’s benefit, or of any survivor’s benefit, to be paid to the alternate payee, or sets out the manner in which that amount or percentage is to be determined;

sets out the number of payments or period to which the order applies;

sets out the plan to which the order applies;

does not require any type or form of benefit or any option not otherwise provided by AS

14.25.009

—

14.25.220

;

does not require an increase of benefits in excess of the amount provided by AS

14.25.009

—

14.25.220

, determined on the basis of actuarial value; and

does not require the payment, to an alternate payee, of benefits that are required to be paid to another alternate payee under another order previously determined to be a qualified domestic relations order;

“retired teacher or member” means a member who is terminated, who has not received a refund from the plan, and who is receiving a benefit, other than disability, from the plan;

“retirement” means that period of time from the first day of the month following

the date of termination; and

application for retirement in which a person is appointed to receive a retirement benefit, other than a disability benefit;

“retirement benefit” means the annuity received by a retired member from the plan;

“retirement fund” or “fund” means the fund in which the assets of the plan, including income and interest derived from the investment of money, are deposited and held;

“Retirement System of 1945” and “Retirement Fund of 1945” or like terms mean the system and fund established in sections 37-5-21 — 37-5-35, ACLA 1949;

“school year” means the 12-month period beginning July 1 of each year and ending June 30 of the following year;

“supplemental contribution account” means the account maintained by the plan to record the supplemental contributions of each member, including interest and adjustments to the account;

“system” means all retirement plans established under the teachers’ retirement system;

“teacher” and “member” are used interchangeably under AS

14.25.009

—

14.25.220

and mean a person eligible to participate in the plan and who is covered by the plan, limited to

a certificated full-time or part-time elementary or secondary teacher, a certificated school nurse, or a certificated person in a position requiring a teaching certificate as a condition of employment in a public school of the state, the Department of Education and Early Development, or the Department of Labor and Workforce Development;

a full-time or part-time teacher of the University of Alaska or a person occupying a full-time administrative position at the University of Alaska that requires academic standing; the approval of the administrator must be obtained before an administrative position qualifies for membership in the plan; however, a teacher or administrative person at the university who is participating in a university retirement program under AS

14.40.661

—

14.40.799

is not a member under this plan;

a state legislator who elects membership under AS

14.25.040(b)

;

“territorial employment” means non-teaching employment with the Territory of Alaska as provided under AS

14.25.105

; territorial employment is not membership service;

“vested member” or “vested teacher” means an active member who has completed either

15 years of service, the last five of which have been membership service, for a member first hired before July 1, 1975;

eight years of membership service;

five years of membership and three years of BIA service; or

12 school years of part-time membership service or 12 school years in each of which the member earned either part-time or full-time membership service;

“year of service” means service, except for military and territorial service, during the dates set for a school year; partial-year service credit is given for membership and BIA service as follows:

before July 1, 1969, during any school year,

less than 20 days, no credit;

20 days or more but less than 35 days, 0.2 years;

35 days or more but less than 49 days, 0.3 years;

49 days or more but less than 63 days, 0.4 years;

63 days or more but less than 77 days, 0.5 years;

77 days or more but less than 91 days, 0.6 years;

91 days or more but less than 105 days, 0.7 years;

105 days or more but less than 119 days, 0.8 years;

119 days or more but less than 133 days, 0.9 years;

133 days or more, 1.0 years;

on or after July 1, 1969, during any school year,

less than nine days, no credit;

nine days or more but less than 27 days, 0.1 years;

27 days or more but less than 45 days, 0.2 years;

45 days or more but less than 63 days, 0.3 years;

63 days or more but less than 81 days, 0.4 years;

81 days or more but less than 100 days, 0.5 years;

100 days or more but less than 118 days, 0.6 years;

118 days or more but less than 136 days, 0.7 years;

136 days or more but less than 154 days, 0.8 years;

154 days or more but less than 172 days, 0.9 years;

172 days or more, 1.0 years;

service performed on a part-time basis will be credited in proportion to the amount of credit that would have been received for service performed on a full-time basis.

History.

(§ 2 ch 145 SLA 1955; am § 1 ch 142 SLA 1957; am § 2 ch 89 SLA 1960; am § 7 ch 179 SLA 1960; am §§ 1, 2 ch 78 SLA 1962; am §§ 8 — 12 ch 86 SLA 1963; am § 1 ch 111 SLA 1965; am §§ 20 — 22 ch 151 SLA 1966; am § 1 ch 76 SLA 1968; am §§ 15 — 19 ch 84 SLA 1969; am § 21 ch 46 SLA 1970; am §§ 13 — 18 ch 138 SLA 1970; am §§ 3 — 5 ch 229 SLA 1970; am §§ 16 — 18 ch 32 SLA 1971; am §§ 6 — 8 ch 86 SLA 1971; am §§ 30 — 33 ch 66 SLA 1973; am § 3 ch 57 SLA 1974; am § 21 ch 127 SLA 1974; am §§ 12, 13 ch 173 SLA 1975; am §§ 1, 6 ch 155 SLA 1976; am § 5 ch 169 SLA 1976; am §§ 12, 13 ch 128 SLA 1977; am §§ 4, 5 ch 174 SLA 1978; am §§ 4 — 7 ch 82 SLA 1979; am § 24 ch 13 SLA 1980; am §§ 25 — 28 ch 137 SLA 1982; am § 1 ch 55 SLA 1985; am §§ 4 — 7 ch 82 SLA 1986; am § 4 ch 112 SLA 1986; am § 19 ch 117 SLA 1986; am §§ 18, 19 ch 106 SLA 1988; am § 31 ch 50 SLA 1989; am § 3 ch 104 SLA 1989; am § 16 ch 97 SLA 1990; am § 1 ch 44 SLA 1992; am § 1 ch 53 SLA 2000; am §§ 17 — 20 ch 68 SLA 2000; am §§ 14 — 16 ch 59 SLA 2002; am § 1 ch 49 SLA 2003; am §§ 13, 14 ch 92 SLA 2004; am §§ 29 — 34, 132 ch 9 FSSLA 2005; am §§ 14, 15 ch 20 SLA 2007; am § 6 ch 13 SLA 2008)

Revisor’s notes. —

Reorganized in 1987, 2002, 2005, and 2008 to alphabetize the defined terms.

In 1999, in various paragraphs of this section, “commissioner of education” was changed to “commissioner of education and early development” and “Department of Education” was changed to “Department of Education and Early Development” in accordance with § 89, ch. 58, SLA 1999.

In 2005, in (6)(B) of this section, “AS

39.35.680

(9)” was substituted for “AS

39.35.680

(8)” to reflect the 2005 renumbering of AS 39.35.680(8).
Also in 2005, under sec. 144, ch. 9, FSSLA 2005, “AS

14.25.009

—

14.25.220

” was substituted for “this chapter” and “plan” was substituted for “system” in this section.

Administrative Code. —

For benefits under the defined benefits plan of the teachers’ retirement system, see 2 AAC 36, art. 3.

For service under the defined benefits plan (AS

14.25.009

—

14.25.220

), see 2 AAC 36, art. 4.

Editor’s notes. —

In general, a person’s right to benefits under the state’s public employee retirement systems vests when the person joins the system. Hammond v. Hoffbeck, 627 P.2d 1052 (Alaska 1981). Therefore, former law may govern the benefits of some members of the teachers’ retirement system. The user is advised to ascertain which version of the statute is applicable. Earlier versions of the statutes can be found in prior editions of the Alaska Statutes or in the published Session Laws of Alaska.

Opinions of attorney general. —

Amounts paid by the Anchorage School District to the Anchorage Education Association for dues for the association’s representation of teachers in the district should not be included in base salary either for payment of contributions or for computation of benefits. July 25, 1989 Op. Att’y Gen.